New Jersey, session 222, A4143.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a. The State Treasurer shall annually, on or before April 1, or the date of the State Treasurers first appearance before the Legislatures budget committees next following the presentation of the Governors budget message, whichever occurs first, submit to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, a multi-year fiscal outlook analysis of the trajectory of the Governors proposed budget.  The analysis shall include the following information for the ensuing fiscal year and the next two succeeding fiscal years thereafter, which information shall contain distinct projections of any structural deficit based on an optimistic, pessimistic, and baseline economic scenario for each fiscal year, respectively: (1) an itemized statement of the anticipated amount of all appropriations from the State General Fund, other budgeted State revenues, other dedicated funds, and Federal aid and trust funds, as shall be recommended pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection C. of section 11 of Article 3 of P.L.1944, c.112 (C.52:27B-20).  The anticipated amounts shall be projected using a current services basis of budgeting and adjusted using economic metrics, including, but not limited to, program-specific inflation metrics, previously-enacted program expansions and eliminations, and caseload or population changes.  The analysis shall include a statement explaining the underlying assumptions and methods used to calculate the amounts anticipated pursuant to this paragraph, including the assumptions underlying the optimistic, pessimistic, and baseline economic scenarios.  The analysis shall include estimates of the amounts necessary to pay principal and interest due on capital projects financed through the issuance of general obligations bonds and appropriation-backed contract bonds issued by independent authorities of the State; and (2) a projection of anticipated revenues from all sources applicable to those budget periods and an estimate of all balances projected to be on hand and available for appropriation upon the conclusion of each fiscal year, as such amounts shall be estimated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection A. of section 11 of Article 3 of P.L.1944, c.112 (C.52:27B-20).  The analysis shall include a statement explaining the underlying assumptions and methods used to calculate the amounts estimated pursuant to this paragraph, including the assumptions underlying the optimistic, pessimistic, and baseline economic scenarios. b.  The State Treasurer shall annually, on or before May 31, or the date of the State Treasurers second appearance before the Legislatures budget committees next following the presentation of the Governors budget message, whichever occurs earlier, submit an updated multi-year fiscal outlook to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature.  The updated multi-year fiscal outlook analysis shall include all information required pursuant to subsection b. of this section and shall include a statement explaining any revisions to the analysis submitted for that fiscal year pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.  As used in this section, current services basis of budgeting means an approach to budgeting that is based on estimating the cost required to maintain benefits, programs, and services at the levels authorized in the Governors proposed budget in succeeding fiscal years, as adjusted for changes in enrollment, caseload and population changes, statutory cost-of-living adjustments, and previously-enacted program expansions and eliminations. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.